Utah statutes.
22-3-604.   Transitional provisions.

Section 22-3-409 applies to a trust described in Subsection 22-3-409(4) as follows:

(1)  If the trust is not funded as of May 12, 2009, then Section 22-3-409 applies to the trust on the date of the decedent's death.

(2)  If the trust is initially funded in the calendar year beginning January 1, 2009, then Section 22-3-409 applies to the trust on the date of the decedent's death.

(3)  If the trust is not described in Subsection (1) or (2), then Section 22-3-409 applies to the trust as of January 1, 2009.



Enacted by Chapter 96, 2009 General Session

